Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.240

Duties of payroll officer.

The person responsible for making up the payroll shall transmit promptly to the department at the end of each and every payroll period a copy of the original payroll voucher or such other payroll report as the department may require showing thereon all deductions for contributions for the teachers' retirement system made from the earnable compensation of a member of the teachers' retirement system together with warrants or checks covering the total of such deductions. The department shall place such moneys into the proper funds established in this chapter.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 17. Formerly RCW 41.32.830.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 293: See notes following RCW 41.32.755.